Massachusetts, session 194th, S2641.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 94 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following
section:-
Section 330. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following words shall have the
following meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
“Ingredient”, an intentionally added substance present in a menstrual product.
“Manufacturer”, (i) a person or entity that manufactures a menstrual product and whose
name appears on the product label; or (ii) a person or entity for whom the menstrual product is
manufactured or distributed, as identified on the product label pursuant to 15 U.S.C. section 1451
et seq.
“Menstrual product”, a product used to collect menstruation and vaginal discharge
including, but not limited to, tampons, pads, menstrual cups, disks, sponges and menstrual
underwear, whether disposable or reusable.
of 2

(b) A package or box containing menstrual products manufactured for sale or distribution
in the commonwealth shall have a label, printed or affixed thereto, that includes a plain and
conspicuous list of all the product’s ingredients in order of predominance.
(c) A manufacturer of a menstrual product that is manufactured for sale or distribution in
the commonwealth shall post on their internet website, in an electronically readable format, the
ingredient information that is required to be disclosed pursuant to subsection (b).
(d) If there is a change or addition of an ingredient to a menstrual product, the
manufacturer shall update: (i) the label on such menstrual product box or package not later than
18 months after the change or addition of said ingredient; and (ii) the ingredient information
disclosed on the internet website pursuant to subsection (c) not later than 2 months after the
change or addition of the ingredient.
(e) A manufacturer in violation of this section shall be punished by a fine of not more
than $1,000 dollars per violation.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect 12 months after its passage.
of 2